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DTC 13 Fuel Tank Select Relay Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 38.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

13

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch OFF

(Voltage of FPMS terminal is low)
(b) Voltage of FPM terminal is low
(c) Voltage of FPMR terminal is high

SFuel tankselect relay
SOpenorshort inmain fuelpumpcircuit
SMain fuelpump
SFuelpumprelay
SCircuitopening relay
SShort insub fuel tank forcingdriving relaycircuit
SSub fuel tank forcingdriving relay
SShort insub fuelpumpcircuit (+Bshort)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 38.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI−56).

NG Replace fuel tank select relay.

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) Fuel tank changeover switch is OFF.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU and
bodyground,and turn the ignitionswitchONafter4seconds
or more.
OK:

Voltage:0 − 3.0V

OK Go to step 5.

NG

DI3ME−02
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3 Check sub fuel tank forcing driving relay (See page FI−58).

NG Replace sub fuel tank forcing driving relay, and
then go to step 5.

OK

4 Check for short in harness and connector between sub fuel tank forcing driving
relay and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness and connector, and
then go to step 5.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

5 Check voltage between terminal FPM of engine ECU connector and body ground
(See page DI−1 38, step 1).

OK Go to step 8.

NG

6 Check fuel pump relay (Marking: FUEL/PMP) (See page FI−54).

NG Replace fuel pump relay.

OK



DI−1 48
−DIAGNOSTICS SUBFUELTANKSYSTEM

2UZ−FEENGINE(RM630E)

7 Check circuit opening relay (Marking: C/OPN) (See page FI−53).

NG Replace circuit opening relay.

OK

8 Check operation of main fuel pump (See page DI−1 38, step 5).

HINT:
If youhavenohand −held tester,and thengo tostep9.

OKGotostep 11.

NG

9 Check main fuel pump (See page FI−7) .

NG Replace main fuel pump.

OK

10Checkforopenorshort inharnessandconnectorbetweenmain fuelpumpand
fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and fuel pump relay, fuel pump relay
and circuit opening relay (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace.

OK



−DIAGNOSTICS SUB FUEL TANK SYSTEM
DI−1 49

2UZ−FEENGINE(RM630E)

11 Checkforopenandshort inharnessandconnectorbetweenfuel tankselect
relay and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


